Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
Article 1 General Provisions

Administrative rules and regulations.

Drug Abuse Treatment and Education Programs, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Chapter 111-8-19.

26-5-1.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Drug Abuse Treatment and Education Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 2/SB 88.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 4, 2017, substituted “article” for “chapter” in this Code section.

26-5-2.
Legislative intent.

The purpose of this article is to provide for the classification and systematic evaluation of various programs designed for the treatment and therapeutic rehabilitation of drug dependent persons; to ensure that every governing body which operates a drug abuse treatment and education program is licensed to do so; and to meet the rehabilitative needs of drug dependent persons while safeguarding their individual liberties.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 26; Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 2/SB 88.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 4, 2017, substituted “article” for “chapter” near the beginning of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For note, “The Diversion of Drug Abusers from the Criminal Justice System: Georgia’s Proposed Legislation,” see 23 Emory L.J. 1071 (1974).

26-5-3.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Department” means the Department of Community Health or its successor.

“Drug abuse treatment and education program” means any system of treatment or therapeutic advice or counsel provided for the rehabilitation of drug dependent persons and shall include programs offered in the following types of facilities:

Residential care centers. A facility staffed by professional and paraprofessional persons offering treatment or therapeutic programs for drug dependent persons who live on the premises; and

Nonresidential care centers. A non-live-in facility, staffed by professional and paraprofessional persons, offering treatment or therapeutic programs for drug dependent persons who do not live on the premises.

“Drug dependent person” means a person who is in imminent danger of becoming dependent upon or addicted to the use of drugs or who habitually lacks self-control as to the use of drugs or who uses drugs to the extent that his health is substantially impaired or endangered or his social or economic function is substantially disrupted.

“Drugs” means any substance defined as a drug by federal or Georgia law or any other chemical substance which may be used in lieu of a drug to obtain similar effects, with the exception of alcohol and its derivatives.

“Governing body” means the county board of health, the partnership, the corporation, the association, or the person or group of persons who maintains and controls the program and who is legally responsible for the operation.

“License” means the official permit issued by the director which authorizes the holder to operate a drug abuse treatment and education program for the term provided therein.

“Licensee” means any person holding a license issued by the director under this article.

“Program” means the drug abuse treatment and education program.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 26; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 2; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 26; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 2/SB 88.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 4, 2017, substituted “article” for “chapter” in the introductory paragraph and at the end of paragraph (7).

26-5-4.
Classification of programs.

The department is authorized to classify all programs within the state according to the character and range of services provided.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 3.

26-5-5.
Promulgation of minimum standards of quality and services for each class of programs.

The department shall create and promulgate minimum standards of quality and services for each designated class of programs. At least the following areas shall be covered in the rules and regulations:

Adequate and safe buildings or housing facilities where programs are offered;

Adequate equipment for the delivery of programs;

Sufficient trained or experienced staff who are competent in the duties they are to perform;

The content and quality of services to be provided;

Requirements for intake, discharge, and aftercare of drug dependent persons;

Referral to other appropriate agencies;

Continuing evaluation of the effectiveness of programs;

Maintenance of adequate records on each drug dependent person treated or advised;

A formal plan of cooperation with other programs in the state to allow for continuity of care for drug dependent persons; and

Criteria for providing priority in access to services and admissions to programs for drug dependent pregnant females.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 4; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 26; Ga. L. 1991, p. 977, § 1.

26-5-6.
Promulgation of rules and regulations.

The department is authorized and directed to create and promulgate all rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 12; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 5; Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 2/SB 88.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 4, 2017, substituted “article” for “chapter” at the end of this Code section.

26-5-7.
License required.

No governing body shall operate a drug abuse treatment and education program without having a valid license or provisional license issued pursuant to this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 6; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 6; Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 2/SB 88.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 4, 2017, substituted “article” for “chapter” at the end of this Code section.

26-5-8.
Application for license.

Application for a license to operate a program shall be submitted by the governing authority to the department in the manner prescribed by rules and regulations and shall contain a comprehensive outline of the program to be offered by the applicant.

Proof of compliance with all applicable federal and state laws for the handling and dispensing of drugs and all state and local health, safety, sanitation, building, and zoning codes shall be attached to the application submitted to the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, §§ 7, 8; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 7.

26-5-9.
Provisional licenses.

The department may issue a provisional license effective for a period not to exceed 90 days to each applicant who has substantially complied with all requirements for a regular license. Provisional licenses shall be renewed in the discretion of the department only in cases of extreme hardship and in no case for longer than 90 days. The obligations and conditions of a provisional license shall be the same as those of a regular license except as otherwise provided for in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 9; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 8; Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 2/SB 88.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 4, 2017, substituted “article” for “chapter” at the end of the last sentence.

26-5-10.
Issuance of license; revocation or suspension.

The department may, upon submission of an application, with proof of accreditation by a voluntary accreditation agency approved by the department, issue a license based upon the findings of the accreditation agency. The license may be issued without an on-site visit by the department representative. Any denial, suspension, or revocation of the voluntary accreditation agency shall result in an automatic revocation or suspension of the license issued under this Code section, and the holder must apply for a new license as provided for in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 10; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 9; Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 2/SB 88.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 4, 2017, substituted “article” for “chapter” at the end of the last sentence.

26-5-11.
Conditions for issuance of license; nontransferability.

The department shall issue a license to a governing body for any program which meets all the rules and regulations for the class of license applied for. The license shall be nontransferable for a change of location or governing body.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 11; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 10.

26-5-12.
Records of drug dependent persons treated or advised.

Subject to the limitations of Code Section 26-5-17, the department may require at reasonable intervals, and each licensee shall furnish copies of complete records of each drug dependent person treated or advised pursuant to a program.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 14; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 11; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 26.

26-5-13.
Inspection of programs.

Each licensee shall permit the authorized department representatives to enter upon and inspect any and all premises upon or in which a program is to be conducted or for which a license has been applied so that verification of compliance with all relevant laws or regulations can be made.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 15; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 12.

26-5-14.
Denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses.

The department may deny any license applied for under this article that does not fulfill the minimum requirements which the department may prescribe by rules and regulations and may suspend or revoke a license which has been issued if an applicant or a licensee violates any of such rules and regulations; provided, however, that before any order is entered denying a license applied for or suspending or revoking a license previously granted, the applicant or license holder, as the case may be, shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing as provided for in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 16; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 13; Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 3/SB 88.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 4, 2017, substituted “article” for “chapter” near the beginning of this Code section.

26-5-15.
Notice of proposed denial, suspension, or revocation; hearing.

Notice of a proposed denial, suspension, or revocation of a license shall be provided in writing by the department to any licensee so affected within 90 days after the application is filed or the grounds are discovered. Within ten days from receipt of such notice, the licensee so affected may request a hearing before the department. Upon receipt of such request for hearing in proper form, the department shall schedule a hearing within a reasonable time, but not later than 90 days.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 17; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 14.

26-5-16.
Applicability of “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The promulgation of rules and regulations, the conduct of administrative hearings, and judicial review of the department’s actions shall be subject to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 13; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 15.

26-5-17.
Confidentiality of records, names, and communications.

For the purpose of providing more effective treatment and rehabilitation, the records and name of any drug dependent person who seeks or obtains treatment, therapeutic advice, or counsel from any program licensed under this article shall be confidential and shall not be revealed except to the extent authorized in writing by the drug dependent person affected; furthermore, any communication by such drug dependent person to an authorized employee of any holder of a license shall be deemed confidential; provided, however, that, except for matters privileged under other laws of this state, the records of such person and information about such person shall be produced in response to a valid court order of any court of competent jurisdiction after a full and fair show-cause hearing and in response to a departmental request for access for licensing purposes when such request is accompanied by a written statement that no record of patient identifying information will be made.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 18; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 16; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 26; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 26; Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 2/SB 88.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 4, 2017, substituted “article” for “chapter” near the middle of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For comment, “The Psychotherapist-Client Testimonial Privilege: Defining the Professional Involved,” see 34 Emory L.J. 777 (1985).

26-5-18.
Injunctions; nuisances per se.

The department is authorized to enforce this article and the rules and regulations promulgated under this article by injunction. Any violation of this article or any rule or regulation promulgated under this article shall be a nuisance per se; and it shall not be necessary to allege or prove the exhaustion of remedies at law to obtain an injunction under this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 19; Ga. L. 1985, p. 476, § 17; Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 2/SB 88.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 4, 2017, substituted “article” for “chapter” throughout this Code section.

26-5-19.
Penalty.

Any person who violates this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 714, § 20; Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 2/SB 88.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 4, 2017, substituted “article” for “chapter” in this Code section.

26-5-20.
Priority admissions policy for drug dependent pregnant females.

Any program licensed or funded by the department under this article shall implement a priority admissions policy for the treatment of drug dependent pregnant females which provides for immediate access to services for any such female applying for admission, which access shall be contingent only upon the availability of space.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 977, § 2; Ga. L. 2017, p. 307, § 2/SB 88.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 4, 2017, substituted “article” for “chapter” near the beginning of this Code section.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, a comma was inserted following the word “admission” near the end of this Code section.

26-5-21.
[Reserved] State Commission on Narcotic Treatment Programs; abolishment.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 26/HB 1428 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective May 2, 2022.

26-5-22.
Annual on-site inspections of narcotic treatment programs.

The authorized department shall conduct an annual on-site inspection of each narcotic treatment program licensed in this state. Such inspection shall include, but shall not be limited to, the premises, staff, persons in care, and documents pertinent to the continued licensing of such narcotic treatment program so that the department may determine whether a provider is operating in compliance with licensing requirements.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 319, § 5-1/HB 249; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 26/SB 365.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in the first sentence of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2017 enactment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 143 (2017).

26-5-23.
Publication of annual report.

The Department of Community Health and the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities shall publish an annual report using data from the department’s central registry data base on the number of patients in enrolled treatment, the number of patients discharged from treatment, each patient’s state of residence, and other information determined by the departments. Such published report shall exclude patient identifying information and be compliant with state and federal laws.

History.

Code 1981, §

26-5-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 319, § 5-1/HB 249; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 26/SB 365; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 26/SB 52.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “patients’ states” for “patients’ state” in the first sentence of this Code section.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “each patient’s state of residence” for “patients’ states of residence” near the end of the first sentence.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2017 enactment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 143 (2017).